Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 2. Building Codes

§ 17-2-1.
Certain counties required to enforce wind and flood mitigation requirements of nationally recognized codes and standards; counties and municipalities within the counties may choose not to be subject to the code requirements under certain circumstances.

The counties of Jackson, Harrison, Hancock, Stone and Pearl River, including all municipalities therein, shall enforce, on an emergency basis, all the wind and flood mitigation requirements prescribed by the 2003 International Residential Code and the 2003 International Building Code, as supplemented.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, emergency wind and flood building requirements imposed in this section shall remain in force until the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authorities, as the case may be, adopts as minimum mandatory codes the latest editions of the codes described in subsection (3) (a) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the wind and flood mitigation requirements imposed by this section shall be enforced by the county board of supervisors or municipal governing authorities, as the case may be.

A county board of supervisors or municipal governing authorities, as the case may be, described in subsection (1) of this section shall adopt as minimum codes the latest editions of the following:

International Building Code and the standards referenced in that code for regulation of construction within these counties. The appendices of that code may be adopted as needed, but the specific appendix or appendices must be referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption.

International Residential Code (IRC) and the standards referenced in that code are included for regulation of construction within these counties. The appendices of that code may be adopted as needed, but the specific appendix or appendices must be referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption, with the exception of Appendix J, Existing Buildings and Structures, which is hereby adopted by this reference.

In addition to any other codes required under this section, a county board of supervisors or municipal governing authorities, as the case may be, described in subsection (1) of this section may adopt the latest editions of any of the following:

Codes established by the Mississippi Building Code Council.

Other codes addressing matters such as electrical, plumbing, mechanical, fire and fuel gas.

The provisions of this section shall go into effect thirty (30) days from April 14, 2006. However, within sixty (60) days after the provisions of this section go into effect, the board of supervisors of a county and/or the governing authorities of any municipality within a county, upon resolution duly adopted and entered upon its minutes, may choose not to be subject to the code requirements imposed under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 541, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 14, 2006.).

§ 17-2-3.
Creation of Mississippi Building Codes Council; reconstitution of council; membership; appointment and terms; vacancies; meetings; quorum; adoption and amendment of discretionary statewide minimum codes; date of adoption of initial code; recommendations for mandatory statewide minimum codes.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Building Codes Council. Each member of the council shall be appointed by the executive director of his respective professional association unless otherwise stated herein. Each member shall serve for a term of three (3) years and until a successor is appointed and qualifies. No person who has previously been convicted of a felony in this state or any other state may be appointed to the council. From and after July 1, 2009, all members of the council shall be residents of the State of Mississippi. The terms of the members serving on the council on April 26, 2011, shall expire on July 1, 2011. The council is hereby reconstituted and shall consist of the following eleven (11) members with terms beginning on July 1, 2011:

One (1) representative of the American Institute of Architects of Mississippi;

One (1) representative of the Associated General Contractors of Mississippi;

One (1) representative of the Mississippi Manufactured Housing Association;

One (1) representative of the Building Officials Association of Mississippi;

Two (2) representatives of the Home Builders Association of Mississippi;

One (1) representative of the Associated Builders and Contractors of Mississippi;

One (1) representative of the American Council of Engineering Companies of Mississippi;

One (1) representative of the Mississippi Municipal League;

One (1) representative of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors; and

The Mississippi State Fire Marshal, or his designee, to serve ex officio, nonvoting.

A vacancy must be filled in the manner of the original appointment for the unexpired portion of the term.

Any member with unexcused absences for more than three (3) consecutive meetings shall be replaced by his sponsoring organization.

The State Fire Marshal shall convene the first meeting of the reconstituted council before October 1, 2011, and shall act as temporary chairman until the council elects from its members a chairman and vice chairman. The council shall adopt regulations consistent with this chapter. A meeting may be called by the chairman on his own initiative, but must be called by him at the request of three (3) or more members of the council. Each member must be notified by the chairman in writing of the time and place of the meeting at least seven (7) days before the meeting. Four (4) members constitute a quorum. Each meeting is open to the public. An official decision of the council may be made only by a vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of those members in attendance at the meeting.

The council shall adopt by reference and amend only one (1) of the last three (3) editions of the following as discretionary statewide minimum codes:

International Building Code and the standards referenced in that code for regulation of construction within this state. The appendices of that code may be adopted as needed, but the specific appendix or appendices must be referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption.

International Residential Code (IRC) and the standards referenced in that code are included for regulation of construction within this state. The appendices of that code may be adopted as needed, but the specific appendix or appendices must be referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption, with the exception of Appendix J, Existing Buildings and Structures, which is hereby adopted by this reference.

Other codes addressing matters such as electrical, plumbing, mechanical, fire and fuel gas.

The initial code or codes adopted by this council under the provisions of this section shall be completed no later than July 1, 2007.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the council shall not enact any ordinance, bylaw, order, building code or rule requiring the installation of a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system or any other fire sprinkler protection system in a new or existing one- or two-family dwelling. However, the county boards of supervisors and municipal governing authorities may adopt, modify and enforce codes adopted by the council, including the adoption of codes which require the installation of fire protection sprinkler systems in any structure.

On or before December 1, 2012, the council shall furnish to all members of the Legislature a report to be considered during the 2013 Regular Session that provides findings and recommendations for building and construction standards as the mandatory statewide minimum codes. The council shall make its recommendation from one (1) of the last three (3) editions of the following:

International Building Code and the standards referenced in that code for regulation of construction within this state. The appendices of that code may be adopted as needed, but the specific appendix or appendices must be referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption.

International Residential Code (IRC) and the standards referenced in that code are included for regulation of construction within this state. The appendices of that code may be adopted as needed, but the specific appendix or appendices must be referenced by name or letter designation at the time of adoption.

Other codes addressing matters such as electrical, plumbing, mechanical, fire and fuel gas.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 541, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 524, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 17-2-4.
State Uniform Construction Code; exemptions.

Except as provided in Section 17-2-1(1) and subsection (3) of this section, a county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority shall adopt and amend as minimum codes one (1) of the following as the State Uniform Construction Code:

One (1) of the last three (3) adopted editions of the International Building Code (IBC) and any specific appendix or appendices as adopted and amended by the Mississippi Building Codes Council;

One (1) of the last three (3) adopted editions of the International Residential Code (IRC), and any specific appendix or appendices as adopted and amended by the Mississippi Building Codes Council, with the exception of those provisions that require the installation of a multipurpose residential fire protection sprinkler system or any other fire sprinkler protection system in a new or existing one- or two-family dwelling;

Other codes addressing matters such as electrical, plumbing, mechanical, fire and fuel gas, and any specific appendix or appendices as adopted and amended by the Mississippi Building Codes Council.

In addition to the codes required under this section, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, a county or municipality may adopt construction codes that are not less stringent than the codes adopted in subsection (1) of this section.

Within one hundred twenty (120) days after the provisions of this section go into effect, the board of supervisors of a county and/or the governing authorities of any municipality within a county, upon resolution duly adopted and entered upon its minutes, may choose not to be subject to the code requirements imposed under this section.

These provisions do not apply to those buildings exempt from enforcement in Section 17-2-7 and Section 17-2-9.

These provisions do not apply to manufactured homes or mobile homes as defined in Section 75-49-3.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 382, § 1, eff from and after Aug. 1, 2014.

§ 17-2-5.
Adoption of minimum codes by county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority; agreements for enforcement of codes.

Any county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority that adopts building codes after July 1, 2008, shall adopt as minimum codes any codes established and promulgated by the Mississippi Building Codes Council.

Any county board of supervisors or municipal governing authority that has adopted construction codes published before January 1, 2000, shall, no later than July 1, 2010, adopt as minimum codes any codes established and promulgated by the Mississippi Building Codes Council.

Any codes adopted by a board of supervisors or municipal governing authority under this section shall be enforced by the board of supervisors or municipal governing authority, as the case may be.

Municipalities and counties may establish agreements with other governmental entities of the state or certified third-party providers to issue permits and enforce state building codes in order to provide the services required by Chapter 524, Laws of 2007. The council may assist in arranging for municipalities, counties or third-party providers the provision of services required by Chapter 524, Laws of 2007, if a written request from the governing authority of the county or municipality is submitted to the council.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 541, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 524, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 412, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 17-2-7.
Farm structures exempt from provisions of this chapter.

For purposes of this section, “farm structure” means a structure that is constructed on a farm, other than a residence or a structure attached to it, for use on the farm, including, but not limited to, barns, sheds and poultry houses, but not public livestock areas. For purposes of this section, “farm structure” does not include a structure originally qualifying as a “farm structure” but later converted to another use.

The governing body of a county or municipality shall not enforce that portion of any building code established and/or imposed under Sections 17-2-1 through 17-2-5 that regulates the construction or improvement of a farm structure.

The provisions of this section do not apply unless, before constructing or improving a farm structure, the person owning the property on which the structure is to be constructed files an affidavit with the county or municipal official responsible for enforcing the building code stating that the structure is being constructed as a farm structure. The affidavit must include a statement of purpose or intended use of the proposed structure or addition.

This section does not affect the authority of the governing body of a county or municipality to issue building permits before an affidavit for the construction or improvement of a farm structure is filed under subsection (3) of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any floodplain management ordinances or regulations necessary for eligibility for the National Flood Insurance Program, and such floodplain management ordinances or regulations shall apply retroactively to any construction or improvement permit granted for any structure exempted under this section before May 22, 2012.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 541, § 4; Laws, 2012, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 382, § 2, eff from and after Aug. 1, 2014.

§ 17-2-9.
Certain other buildings, facilities and manufactured housing exempt from provisions of this chapter.

The governing authority of any county or municipality shall not enforce any portion of any building codes established and/or imposed under Sections 17-2-1 through 17-2-5 that regulates the construction or improvement of industrial facilities that are engaged in activities designated as manufacturing (sectors 31-33), utilities (sector 22), telecommunications (sector 517), bulk stations and materials (sector 422710), crude oil pipelines (sector 486110), refined petroleum products pipelines (sector 486910), natural gas pipelines (sector 486210), other pipelines (sector 486990) and natural gas processing plants (sector 211112), under the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS).

The governing authority of any county or municipality shall not enforce any portion of any building codes established and/or imposed under Sections 17-2-1 through 17-2-5 which regulates the construction or improvement of buildings located on nonpublic fairgrounds or the construction or improvement of buildings located on the Neshoba County Fairgrounds in Neshoba County, Mississippi.

The governing authority of any county or municipality shall not enforce any portion of any building codes established and/or imposed under Sections 17-2-1 through 17-2-5 which regulates the construction or improvement of a private unattached outdoor recreational structure, such as a hunting or fishing camp. In order for a structure to qualify as a “hunting camp” or “fishing camp” under the provisions of this subsection, the owner must file with the board of supervisors of the county in which the structure is located his signed affidavit stating under oath that the structure is a hunting camp or fishing camp, as the case may be, that he is the owner or an owner of the camp and that the camp is located in an unincorporated area of the county within, near or in close proximity to land upon which hunting or fishing activities legally may take place.

The governing authority of any county or municipality shall not enforce any portion of any building codes established and/or imposed under Sections 17-2-1 through 17-2-5 which regulates the construction or improvement of manufactured housing built according to the Federal Manufactured Home Construction and Safety Standards Act.

The governing authority of Pearl River County or any municipality within such county shall not enforce any portion of any building codes established and/or imposed under Sections 17-2-1 through 17-2-5 which prohibits the use of or requires building permit approval for the use of salvage lumber or green cut timber in building construction provided such timber is for personal use and is not for sale.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any floodplain management ordinances or regulations necessary for eligibility for the National Flood Insurance Program, and such floodplain management ordinances or regulations shall apply retroactively to any construction or improvement permit granted for any structure exempted under this section before May 22, 2012.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 541, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 524, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 303, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 540, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 382, § 3, eff from and after Aug. 1, 2014.